Washington statutes.
RCW 33.08.010

Compliance required—Use of words in name or advertising—Penalty—Saving.

No person, firm, company, association, fiduciary, co-partnership, or corporation, either foreign or domestic, shall organize as, carry on or conduct the business of an association except in conformity with the terms and provisions of this title or unless incorporated as a savings and loan association under the laws of the United States or use in name or advertising any of the following:

Any collocation employing either or both of the words "building" or "loan" with one or more of the words "saving", "savings", "thrift", or words of similar import except in conformity with this title;

Any collocation employing one or more of the words "saving", "savings", "thrift" or words of similar import, with one or more of the words "association", "institution", "society", "company", "corporation", or words of similar import, or abbreviations thereof except in conformity with this title or unless authorized to do business under the laws of this state or of the United States relating to savings and loan associations, banks, or mutual savings banks; nor shall the word "federal" be used as a part of such name unless the user is incorporated as a savings and loan association under the laws of the United States.

Neither shall the words "saving", or "savings", be used in any name or advertising or to represent in any manner to indicate that the business is of the character or kind of business carried on or transacted by an association or which is calculated to lead any person to believe that the business is that of an association unless authorized to do business under the laws of this state or of the United States relating to savings and loan associations, banks, or mutual savings banks.

Every person who, and every director and officer of every corporation which, to the knowledge of such director or officer, violates any provision of this section, shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor. Such conduct shall also be deemed a nuisance and subject to abatement in the manner prescribed by law at the instance of the director of financial institutions or any other public body or officer authorized to do so.

The provisions of this section shall have no application to use of any word or collocation of words or to any representation or advertising which had been adopted and lawfully used by any person, firm, company, association, fiduciary, co-partnership or corporation lawfully engaged in business on March 24, 1959.

[ 1994 c 92 s 426; 1959 c 280 s 1; 1945 c 235 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-121. Prior: 1933 c 183 ss 84, 100; 1919 c 169 s 1; 1913 c 110 ss 2, 25; 1890 p 56 ss 2, 22, 37.]